Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 34.1 Rental Vehicle Surcharge

31-34.1-1.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases used in this chapter, for the purposes of this chapter, have the following meanings:

“Excise tax” means the tax imposed under chapter 34 of title 44.

“Gross receipts” means the total amount of money for the value of other consideration received by a renter of motor vehicles from motor vehicles rented in the state of Rhode Island. Gross receipts includes any charges related to the rental including gas, insurance, etc. whether or not set out in separate contract.

“Motor vehicle” means a private passenger motor vehicle designed to transport fifteen (15) or fewer passengers that is rented without a driver and is part of a fleet of five (5) or more passenger vehicles used for that purpose, owned or leased by the same person or entity.

“Rental company” means any business entity engaged in the business of renting motor vehicles in the state of Rhode Island.

“Rented in this state” means any vehicle if it is picked up by or delivered to the renter in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 272, § 1.

31-34.1-2.
Rental vehicle surcharge.

Each rental company shall collect, at the time a motor vehicle is rented in this state, on each rental contract, a surcharge equal to eight percent (8.0%) of gross receipts per vehicle on all rentals for each of the first thirty (30) consecutive days. The surcharge shall be computed prior to the assessment of any applicable sales taxes, provided, however, the surcharge shall be subject to the sales tax.

The surcharge shall be included on the rental contract and collected in accordance with the terms of the rental contract. Sixty percent (60%) of the surcharge shall be retained by the rental company in accordance with this section and subsection (c), and forty percent (40%) of the surcharge shall be remitted to the state for deposit in the general fund, on a quarterly basis in accordance with a schedule adopted by the tax administration. Each rental company collecting and retaining surcharge amounts may reimburse itself in accordance with this section from the funds retained for the total amount of motor vehicle licensing fees, title fees, registration fees and transfer fees paid to the state of Rhode Island and excise taxes imposed upon the rental companies’ motor vehicles during the prior calendar year; provided, that rental companies shall not be authorized to reimburse themselves for title fees, motor vehicles licensing fees, transfer fees, registration fees and excise taxes unless those fees and taxes shall have been assessed and paid in full to the state or appropriate city or town prior to any reimbursement. No reimbursement shall be allowed upon the prepayment of any fees or excise taxes.

At a date to be set by the state tax administrator, but not later than February 15th of any calendar year, each rental company shall, in addition to filing a quarterly remittance form, file a report with the state tax administrator on a form prescribed by him or her, stating the total amount of motor vehicles licensing fees, transfer fees, title fees, registration fees and excise taxes paid by the rental company in the previous year. The amount, if any, by which the surcharge collections exceed the amount of licensing fees, title fees, transfer fees, registration fees and excise taxes paid shall be remitted by the rental company to the state of Rhode Island for deposit in the Rhode Island highway maintenance fund beginning in fiscal year 2015.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 44, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 16, § 10; P.L. 2012, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 3.

31-34.1-3.
Regulations.

The tax administrator shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. All administrative provisions of chapters 18 and 19 of title 44 relating to interest, penalties, assessments and hearings shall apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 150, § 1.

31-34.1-4.
False reports — Penalties.

Any person making a false report to the tax administrator with the intent to misrepresent the amount of title fees, motor vehicle licensing fees, transfer fees or excise fees paid or the amount of surcharges collected or who knowingly fails to collect the surcharge as required by this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall upon conviction of each offense be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for not more than one year, or by both fine and imprisonment. In addition to the above penalty, any person convicted of a violation of this section shall forfeit their right to reimbursement for expenses and shall remit the entire six percent (6%) surcharge collected to the state in a manner consistent with §

31-34.1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 44, § 1.